Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 5. Commission Form of Government

§ 21-5-1.
Adoption of commission form of government.

Any city may at any time, upon an election held as hereinafter provided, change the form of government of such city and adopt a commission form of government. It shall be the duty of the governing authorities of any such city to call a special election on the question of the adoption of the commission form of government upon receipt of a petition signed by at least ten per cent of the qualified electors of such city, praying that an election be held to determine whether or not such city shall abandon its existing form of government and adopt the commission form. Such special election shall be held in such city not less than thirty days, nor more than sixty days, from the date of making such order, but if a general election is to be held in such city within sixty days from the making of such order, then the question of the adoption of the commission form of government shall be submitted at such general election, rather than at a special election. Notice of such election shall be given as required by law, and the same shall be held and conducted as other elections in such city. At such election the propositions to be voted on shall be “FOR THE PRESENT FORM OF GOVERNMENT,” and “FOR THE COMMISSION FORM OF GOVERNMENT.” Such propositions shall be printed on the ballot and the elector shall vote by placing a cross (X) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition. The results of such election shall be certified to the governing authorities of the city by the persons holding such election, and at their next regular meeting the governing authorities shall adjudicate on the minutes of the city whether or not the majority of the votes cast at such election were cast in favor of the commission form of government. If a majority of the votes were so cast in favor of the commission form of government, then an order shall be entered providing for the election of officers provided for by this chapter at an election to be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of June next thereafter. The mayor or chief executive officer of the city shall immediately certify to the secretary of state that such city has by election adopted the commission form of government, and such certificate shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose by the secretary of state. If a majority of the votes cast at such election be in favor of the existing form of government, the governing authorities shall so adjudicate by an order upon their minutes, and another election submitting the question of the adoption of the commission form of government shall not be held for a period of at least four years thereafter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6038-6040; 1930, §§ 2626-2628; 1942, § 3374-47; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-5-3.
Operation of government under commission form.

Every city operating under the commission form of government shall be governed by a council, consisting of the mayor and two (2) councilmen (or commissioners), each of whom shall have the right to vote on all questions coming before the council. The terms of office of the governing authorities in every such city, in office at the beginning of the term of office of the mayor and councilmen first elected under the provisions of this chapter shall then immediately cease and terminate. The terms of office of all other officers then in force in such city, whether elected or appointed, shall cease and terminate as soon as the council shall, by resolution, so declare.

The corporate name of every such city shall be “The City of (name of city),” under which name the council shall exercise and perform all the corporate powers, duties and obligations conferred or imposed on it or the members thereof.

Any city having a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants according to the last decennial census and at that time governed by the commission form of government, may at any time, upon an election held as hereinafter provided, increase by two (2) the number of councilmen governing such city; provided that in no event shall the number of councilmen (not including the mayor) be increased to exceed ten (10) members. It shall be the duty of the council to call a special election on the question of the increase in the number of councilmen and upon receipt of a petition signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors of such city, praying that an election be held to determine whether or not such city should increase by two (2) the number of councilmen under the commission form, and such special election shall be held in such city not less than thirty (30) days, nor more than sixty (60) days, from the date of making such order; but if a general election is to be held in such city within sixty (60) days from the making of such order, then the question of the increase in number of councilmen shall be submitted at such general election, rather than at a special election. Notice of such election shall be given as required by law, and the same shall be held and conducted as other elections in such city. At such election the propositions to be voted on shall be “FOR THE PRESENT NUMBER OF COUNCILMEN” and “FOR AN INCREASE BY TWO (2) IN THE NUMBER OF COUNCILMEN,” and such propositions shall be printed on the ballot and the elector shall vote by placing a cross (X) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition. The results of such election shall be certified to the governing authorities of the city by the persons holding such election, and at their next regular meeting the governing authorities shall adjudicate on the minutes of the city whether or not the majority of the votes cast at such election were cast in favor of increasing by two (2) the number of councilmen. If a majority of the votes were so cast in favor of increasing by two (2) the number of councilmen in the commission form of government, then an order shall be entered providing for the election of the two (2) additional councilmen at an election to be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of June next thereafter. The mayor of the city shall immediately certify to the secretary of state that such city has by election determined to be governed by two (2) additional councilmen in the commission form of government and such certificate shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose by the secretary of state. If a majority of the votes cast at such election be in favor of retaining the existing number of councilmen, the council shall so adjudicate by an order upon their minutes, and another election submitting the question of the increasing by two (2) the number of councilmen in the commission form of government shall not be held for a period of at least four (4) years thereafter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6042; 1930, § 2630; 1942, § 3374-48; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 48; Laws, 1973, ch. 328, § 26, eff from and after January 1, 1974.

§ 21-5-5.
Election of mayor and councilmen; qualifications.

The mayor and councilmen (or commissioners) of all cities operated under the commission form of government shall be elected from the city at large, but the municipal authorities may establish as many wards and as many voting precincts in each ward as may be necessary or desirable. No person shall be eligible to the office of mayor or councilman unless he is a qualified elector of such city and shall have been a bona fide resident thereof for a period of at least one year next preceding the date of the commencement of his term of office.

In the event the council should ordain that the councilmen posts shall be separated, as provided in Section 21-5-11, such post shall be so separated for election purposes and persons seeking the office of councilman shall qualify and seek election for a specific post, as designated by ordinance, and each post shall be voted on separately by the qualified electors of the municipality voting in said election.

In the event there should be but one candidate for one of such election posts, or only one candidate for each of such posts, then such candidate or candidates shall be declared to be elected.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6041; 1930, § 2629; 1942, § 3374-55; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1924, ch. 199; Laws, 1928, ch. 184; Laws, 1932, ch. 219; Laws, 1940, ch. 286; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 55; Laws, 1958, ch. 521, § 2.

§ 21-5-7.
Powers and duties of mayor.

The mayor shall be president of the council and preside at all meetings thereof, but he shall not have any power to veto any measure passed by the council. He shall have general supervision of all the affairs and departments of the city government and shall, from time to time, as occasion may demand, report in writing to the council any matters requiring its action. The council shall elect one of its members vice-president of the council, who, in case of a vacancy in the office of mayor, or in the absence or inability of the mayor, shall perform the duties of the mayor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6050; 1930, § 2638; 1942, § 3374-52; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-5-9.
Powers and duties of council; surety bond of officers and employees.

Except as limited by law, the council shall have, exercise, and perform all executive, legislative and judicial powers, duties and obligations bestowed upon governing authorities of municipalities by this title or by any other general law with regard to municipalities, except in cases of conflict between such laws and this chapter, in which case this chapter shall control. The council shall also have the power, from time to time, to create, fill or discontinue any and all offices and employments other than those created in this chapter; to increase or decrease the emoluments thereof; to make all needful rules and regulations for the government of the officers and employees of such city and to enforce a strict observance thereof, and to change the same when deemed necessary; to remove any officer or employee elected or appointed by the council, except as limited by law, and to elect or appoint a successor; to issue and sell the bonds or other obligations of such city in the amounts and in the manner provided by law; and generally to enact and enforce all ordinances and resolutions, and to make and perform all contracts for and on behalf of such city, as may be authorized by law or by the charter of such city.

The council shall also require all officers and employees handling or having the custody of any of the public funds of such city to give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in an amount to be determined by the council (which shall not be less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00)), the premiums on which bonds shall be paid by the city.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6051; 1930, § 2639; 1942, § 3374-53; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 53; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 23; Laws, 1988, ch. 488, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1988).

§ 21-5-11.
Organization of municipal departments.

The executive and administrative powers and duties in such cities shall be distributed into and among as many departments as there shall be members of the council, to be defined and designated by ordinance. The council shall, by ordinance, determine the powers and duties to be exercised and performed by each department, and shall assign the various officers and employees of the city to the appropriate department. The council shall prescribe the powers and duties of such officers and employees and make all such rules and regulations as may be necessary or proper for the efficient and economical conduct of the business of the city. The council shall, by a majority vote, designate one member of the council to be superintendent of each department of the municipal government, and shall define his powers and duties as such superintendent. Such designation may be changed whenever it shall appear that the public service may be benefited thereby unless the councilmen had been elected to head the department as hereinafter provided.

The council may, by ordinance, provide that the commissioners be designated by Post No. 1 and Post No. 2, and by ordinance define the duties which shall be performed by the commissioners elected to each post.

In the event a city with the population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants or more according to the last decennial census and being governed by the commission form of government shall elect pursuant to Section 21-5-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, to have additional councilmen, the council may, by ordinance, provide that the councilmen or commissioners be designated by post numbers, said posts to be numbered consecutively from one (1) upward, and by ordinance define the duties which shall be performed by the commissioners elected to each post.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6052; 1930, § 2640; 1942, § 3374-54; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 54; Laws, 1958, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 328, § 27, eff from and after January 1, 1974.

§ 21-5-13.
Meetings of council; quorum; voting.

Regular public meetings of the council shall be held on the first day of July after the election of the mayor and councilmen (or commissioners) that is not on a weekend, and thereafter at least twice each month, at such time as the council may by resolution provide. When a regular meeting of the council shall fall on a holiday, the council shall meet the following day.

Special meetings may be called at any time by the mayor or by two (2) councilmen. At any and all meetings of the council, a majority of all the members thereof shall constitute a quorum. The quorum required by this section may be established by teleconference or video means as provided in Section 25-41-5(2). The affirmative vote of a majority of all the members of the council shall be necessary to adopt any motion, resolution or ordinance, or to pass any measure whatever, unless a greater number is provided for in this chapter. Upon every vote taken by the council, the yeas and nays shall be called and recorded, and every motion, resolution or ordinance shall be reduced to writing before the vote is taken thereon. Upon request of one or more council members, any motion, resolution or ordinance shall be read by the clerk before the vote is taken thereon.

The council may, pursuant to Section 21-17-17, set a day other than Monday for the holding of its regular bimonthly meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6049; 1930, § 2637; 1942, § 3374-51; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 51; Laws, 1973, ch. 324, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 403, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 319, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 442, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 319, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 21-5-15.
Fixing of salaries.

At the first regular meeting of the council that is first elected, or as soon thereafter as practicable, the council shall, by ordinance, fix the salary of the mayor and each of the councilmen (or commissioners), which ordinance shall not become operative until the same shall have been approved by a majority of the qualified electors voting at an election to be held for that purpose, as provided by this section. Said ordinance shall be published in a newspaper published in said city, and having a general circulation therein, for at least ten days before such election, and notice of the date of such election shall be given by the council for ten days by publication in a newspaper published in such city, and having general circulation therein. In case such ordinance shall be rejected by the electors at such election, then a new ordinance, or ordinances, may be passed by the council and submitted to the electors in like manner, until the same shall have been ratified by the electors. When an ordinance so fixing the salaries shall have been finally adopted and approved, the salaries so fixed shall remain in effect until altered or changed in the manner hereinafter provided.

To reduce the salary so fixed it shall be sufficient that the council adopt an ordinance to that effect, which ordinance shall become effective upon adoption without the necessity of publication or of an election. To increase the salary so fixed, an ordinance shall be duly adopted, by the council, which ordinance shall be published for ten days in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in such city, and the ordinance shall not become effective until it shall have been approved by a majority of the qualified electors of such city voting at an election to be held for that purpose after notice of such election shall have been given by the council for ten days by publication in a newspaper published in such city or having a general circulation therein, the last notice to appear not more than one week next prior to the date of the election.

Every officer or assistant, other than the mayor and councilmen, shall receive such salary or compensation as the council shall by ordinance provide. The salary or compensation of all other employees of such city shall be fixed by the council from time to time, as occasion may demand.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6046; 1930, § 2634; 1942, § 3374-49; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1932, ch. 224; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 49; Laws, 1954, ch. 346, § 1.

§ 21-5-17.
Office hours of mayor and councilmen.

The mayor and councilmen (or commissioners) shall have an office in the city hall, and shall have regular office hours each day, except Sundays and legal holidays, which said office hours shall be fixed by ordinance.

It shall be the duty of the mayor and councilmen to efficiently and economically administer every department of the city government, and they shall devote as much of their time to the business of the city as shall be necessary to accomplish that result. The council shall, by resolution, fix the hours of service of all other officers and employees.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6048; 1930, § 2636; 1942, § 3374-50; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-5-19.
Existing laws, rights and liabilities of city unaffected by reorganization.

All laws governing cities heretofore operating under another form of government not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter respecting the commission form of government shall apply to and govern such cities respectively when they shall come under the said commission form. All bylaws, ordinances, and resolutions lawfully passed and in force in every such city under its former organization, shall remain in force until altered or repealed by the council elected under the provisions of this chapter. The territorial limits of every such city shall remain the same as under its former organization, and all rights and property of every description, which were vested in every such city, under its former organization, shall vest in the same under the organization contemplated by the commission form of government. No right or liability, either in favor of or against such city, and no suit or prosecution of any kind shall be affected by such change, unless otherwise provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6059; 1930, § 2647; 1942, § 3374-56; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-5-21.
Election offenses.

Any officer or employee other than the mayor and councilmen (or commissioners) of any such city who shall solicit or attempt to influence any person to vote for any particular candidate at any election held in such city, or who shall in any manner contribute any money, labor or other valuable thing to any person or organization for election purposes, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding thirty days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6061; 1930, § 2649; 1942, § 3374-57; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 57 eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-5-23.
Commission form Laws of 1908 not repealed.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any way to affect, alter or modify the existence of municipalities now operating under Chapter 108 of the Laws of 1908. Such municipalities shall continue to enjoy the form of government now enjoyed by them, and each shall be possessed of all rights, powers, privileges and immunities granted and conferred by Chapter 108 of the Laws of 1908. The mayor and commissioners of all municipalities now operating under Chapter 108 of the Laws of 1908 shall hold their offices for a term of four (4) years, and until their successors are duly elected and qualified. The officers shall qualify and enter upon the discharge of their duties on the first day of July after such general election that is not on a weekend, and shall hold their office for four (4) years, and until their successors are duly elected and qualified.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2656; 1942, § 3374-58; Laws, 1932, ch. 219; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 58; Laws, 2010, ch. 319, § 1, eff July 22, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.).